Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-524
Audiology or
speech-language pathology assistant; acts prohibited.

An
audiology or speech-language pathology assistant shall not:

(1) Evaluate or diagnose any type of communication disorder;

(2) Evaluate or diagnose any type of dysphagia;

(3) Interpret evaluation results or treatment progress;

(4) Consult or counsel, independent of the licensed audiologist
or speech-language pathologist, with a patient, a patient's family, or staff
regarding the nature or degree of communication disorders or dysphagia;

(5) Plan patient treatment programs;

(6) Represent himself or herself as an audiologist or speech-language
pathologist or as a provider of speech, language, swallowing, or hearing treatment
or assessment services;

(7) Independently initiate, modify, or terminate any treatment
program; or

(8) Fit or dispense hearing instruments.

Laws 1985, LB 129, § 29;

Laws 1988, LB 1100, § 75;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-1,195.07;

Laws 2007, LB247, § 35;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 209;

Laws 2009, LB195, § 11.